District of Columbia statutes.
1-183

Emancipation Day Fund.

(a)

There is established the Emancipation Day Fund (“Fund”) to receive monies for the purposes of funding the Emancipation Day Parade and activities associated with the celebration and commemoration of District of Columbia Emancipation Day.

(b)

The monies in the Fund shall not be a part of, or lapse into, the General Fund of the District of Columbia or any other fund of the District.

(c)

By August 1st of each year, the Secretary of the District of Columbia shall submit a report to the Council that shall include a specific accounting of the expenditure of money in the Fund and any remaining balance. The report shall include:

(1)

The name of any donors or list of anonymous contributions;

(2)

The amount of each contribution;

(3)

A description of any donated property;

(4)

A description of the use of monies for presenting the Emancipation Day Parade; and

(5)

Costs of parade-related programs, activities, purchases, and functions for which the money have been expended.

(d)

Monies shall only be expended from the Fund for the administration of the Emancipation Day Parade. A minimum of 15% of the monies in the Fund shall be used to purchase and provide educational materials. The Fund may be used to purchase food, snacks, entertainment, and non-alcoholic beverages for the general public, participants, and District government employees to celebrate Emancipation Day.

(e)

Each agency, including the Metropolitan Police Department, the District Department of Transportation, the Department of Public Works, and the Department of Parks and Recreation, shall absorb permitting, staffing, and related costs associated with the conduct of the Emancipation Day Parade.

Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-240, § 4, 51 DCR 11225
Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-110, § 2(b), 55 DCR 223
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1102(b), 61 DCR 9990
D.C. Law 17-110, in subsec. (c)(5), substituted “activities, purchases, and functions” for “activities, and functions”; and, in subsec. (d) added the second and third sentences.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added (e).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 4 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Fund Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-125, May 2, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 4400).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 4 of Emancipation Day Fund Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-9, June 5, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 4873).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 4 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Parade and Fund Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-138, April 22, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 4922).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Fund Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-263, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1443).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Emancipation Day Fund Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-17, February 25, 2003, 50 DCR 1948).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Parade and Fund Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-343, January 29, 2004, 51 DCR 1827).
For temporary (90 day) use of prior budgeted reserve funds for Emancipation Day activities, see § 2 of Emancipation Day Reserve Fund Allocation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-641, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1261).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Parade and Fund Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-660, December 29, 2004, 52 DCR 797).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1102(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1102(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1102(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).